Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.640

Mandatory assignment of retirement benefits—Award of costs to prevailing party.

In any action to enforce a dissolution order by means of a mandatory benefits assignment order pursuant to RCW 41.50.530 through 41.50.630 and 26.09.138, the court may award costs to the prevailing party, including an award for reasonable attorneys' fees consistent with RCW 26.09.140. An obligor shall not be considered a prevailing party under this section unless the obligee has acted in bad faith in connection with the proceeding in question. This section does not authorize an award of attorneys' fees against the department of retirement systems or any of the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030.

[ 1987 c 326 s 15.]